Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1412
County bridges; loads exceeding limits or posted capacity; no damage recovery; violation; penalty.

(1) No person shall drive across or go upon any county bridge with a greater weight than the limits set forth in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 60-6,294 or the carrying capacity or weight posted or attached pursuant to section 39-1411.

(2) A person who violates this section shall recover no damages from the county for any accident or injury which may happen to him or her upon such bridge because of damage to or the failure of such bridge caused by such violation.

(3) A person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. I, § 12, p. 512;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 214;

Laws 2018, LB310, § 2.